Missouri, session 2026, HB3127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 379, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 379.965 and 379.967, to read as follows:
379.965. 1. As used in sections 379.965 to 379.967, unless the context otherwise
requires, the following terms mean:
(1) "Covered policy", any policy of:
(a) Homeowners' insurance, as defined in section 374.400;
(b) Dwelling-owners' insurance, as defined in section 374.400; or
(c) Renters' or tenants' insurance, as defined in section 374.400;
(2) "Firearm discharge incident", any incident involving the discharge of a
firearm, as defined in section 571.101, that results in:
(a) Physical damage to the insured property; or
(b) Conditions that render the insured property temporarily uninhabitable,
regardless of whether the discharge was intentional, unintentional, accidental, criminal,
or stray in nature;
(3) "Insured", any individual covered under a covered policy;
(4) "Insurer", any insurance company, including any reciprocal or inter-
insurance exchange, licensed and authorized by the director to write homeowners'
insurance, dwelling-owners' insurance, or renters' or tenants' insurance upon property
located within this state.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3127 2
2. Sections 379.965 to 379.967 shall not be construed to:
(1) Regulate or restrict the lawful manufacture, ownership, possession, carrying,
transportation, or use of firearms;
(2) Impose any duty or liability upon firearm owners or users; or
(3) Affect any right protected under the Constitution of the United States or the
Constitution of Missouri.
3. Each insurer that offers or issues covered policies that are delivered, issued for
delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027, and that
provides coverage for any damage to real or personal property caused by firearm
discharge incidents shall provide coverage for any reasonable increase in living expenses
incurred as a result of a firearm discharge incident that:
(1) Occurs at or near the insured property; and
(2) Causes any injury or damage, including physical damage to the insured
property, that renders the insured property temporarily uninhabitable.
4. The coverage required under this section shall be designed to help with
necessary expenses incurred while the insured property is being repaired or replaced
including, but not limited to:
(1) Temporary housing such as rent for a hotel, apartment, or rental home;
(2) Meals over and above the insured's normal household expenses;
(3) Increased transportation costs; and
(4) Other reasonable and necessary living expenses.
5. An insurer shall specify in the policy declarations of the covered policy the
maximum amount the insurer will pay for additional living expenses under this section,
which shall be either:
(1) A dollar-amount limit in which the insurer pays up to the specified dollar
amount listed in the covered policy; or
(2) An ending-date limit in which the insurer provides coverage for a period not
to exceed the number of days specified in the covered policy, starting from the date of
the firearm discharge incident or the date the insured property becomes uninhabitable.
6. The coverage required under this section shall continue for the duration
required to repair or replace the damaged property or, if the insured permanently
relocates, for the time required for the insured's household to settle elsewhere or until
the insured's household can maintain its normal standard of living. The coverage
period shall be subject to the limit defined by the covered policy as required under
subsection 5 of this section. Payments shall be made for the time needed for repairs to
restore the property to a habitable condition or until the insured's relocation is
complete.

HB 3127 3
7. Coverage required under this section shall not include:
(1) Expenses the insured incurs due to evacuation orders not related to the
firearm discharge incident;
(2) Any living expenses unrelated to the insured's inability to live in the insured
property following the firearm discharge incident; or
(3) Any expenses that are not deemed reasonable and necessary by the insurer.
8. Coverage required under this section shall apply once the insured property is
uninhabitable due to the firearm discharge incident. An insurer may impose a waiting
period of up to forty-eight hours before coverage becomes effective.
9. An insured shall not receive the coverage required under this section unless
the insured:
(1) Notifies the insurer as soon as reasonably practicable after the firearm
discharge incident and includes relevant details;
(2) Provides documentation of all additional living expenses incurred; and
(3) Cooperates with the insurer's investigation, including by providing access to
receipts and any necessary records to substantiate the claim.
379.967. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when an
insured motor vehicle is involved in a firearm discharge incident, the following coverage
requirements shall apply:
(1) If a firearm discharge incident results in a homicide occurring inside the
insured motor vehicle, the resulting damage shall be treated as a covered loss under the
terms of the policy. The insurer shall conduct a total loss evaluation consistent with
standard industry practices including consideration of biohazard contamination,
structural integrity, and restoration costs necessary to return the vehicle to pre-loss
condition; and
(2) If a firearm discharge incident results in damage to the insured motor
vehicle, the insurer shall treat such damage as eligible for repair coverage under the
terms of the existing policy including cosmetic restoration when necessary to return the
vehicle to pre-loss condition.
2. Subsection 1 of this section shall not require insurers to add new coverages or
benefits beyond those provided in the policyholder's selected policy.
3. The coverage required under subsection 1 of this section shall be included in
all standard motor vehicle insurance coverage policies issued in this state.
4. This section shall apply only to insurance coverage for motor vehicles affected
by a firearm discharge incident.
5. The director of the department of commerce and insurance may promulgate
all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of sections 379.965 to 379.967.

HB 3127 4
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
be invalid and void.
✔